California statutes. Education Code
(F) Upon enrollment, the student will be in the student’s first academic year as a matriculated student in California public higher education, as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 66010, will be living in California, and will file an affidavit with the institution stating that the student intends to establish residency in California as soon as possible.

(6) (A) A student who attends Lake Tahoe Community College and who has residence, pursuant to subparagraph (B), in one of the following communities in Nevada:

(i) Incline Village.

(ii) Kingsbury.

(iii) Round Hill.

(iv) Skyland.

(v) Stateline.

(vi) Zephyr Cove.

(B) Residence shall be determined pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 68060) of Chapter 1 of Part 41 of Division 5. A person shall have residence in one of the communities listed in subparagraph (A) if the person has lived in the community for more than one year immediately before seeking the fee exemption pursuant to this paragraph.

(C) The governing board of the Lake Tahoe Community College District shall adopt rules and regulations for determining a student’s residence classification and for establishing procedures for an appeal and review of the residence classification. No more than 200 students shall be exempted from payment of a nonresident tuition fee under this paragraph in any academic year.

(7) (A) A nonresident student who enrolls in a credit English as a second language (ESL) course at a California Community College and who is any of the following:

(i) A recent immigrant, as defined in Section 1101(a)(15) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(ii) A recent refugee, as defined in Section 1101(a)(42) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(iii) A person who has been granted asylum by the United States, as defined in Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(B) This exemption shall apply only to individuals who, upon entering the United States, settled in California and who have resided in California for less than one year.

(C) This exemption shall apply only to the tuition fee for credit ESL courses.

(8) (A) A student who meets all of the following criteria:

(i) Is a nonresident, low-income student who is a resident of Mexico.

(ii) Registers for lower division courses at Cuyamaca College, Grossmont College, Imperial Valley College, MiraCosta College, Palomar College, San Diego City College, San Diego Mesa College, San Diego Miramar College, or Southwestern College.

(iii) Has residence within 45 miles of the California-Mexico border for at least one year immediately before seeking the fee exemption pursuant to this paragraph.

(B) (i) The governing boards of the community colleges described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) that choose to use the exemption pursuant to this paragraph shall adopt one uniform policy that accomplishes all of the following:

(I) Determines a student’s residence classification.

(II) Establishes procedures for an appeal and review of the residence classification.

(III) Determines whether a student is low income.

(ii) As a condition of its students receiving an exemption pursuant to this paragraph, the governing boards of the community colleges described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) that choose to use the exemption pursuant to this paragraph shall collaborate with each other to ensure the adoption of the
 uniform policy pursuant to clause (i).

(C) (i) No more than 1,350 full-time equivalent students (FTES) in total across all community colleges described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) shall be exempted from payment of a nonresident tuition fee under this paragraph in an academic year.

(ii) On or before December 31, 2026, the governing
 boards of the community colleges described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) that elect to use the exemption pursuant to this paragraph shall develop a plan to jointly administer and allocate the total number of FTES authorized under clause (i) pursuant to the uniform policy required by subparagraph (B), including how to address if the colleges collectively exceed the cap established in clause (i).

(iii) The allocation of FTES pursuant to this subparagraph shall not exceed the aggregate total authorized in clause (i).

(iv) A student granted an exemption under this paragraph and enrolled for an academic year shall retain that exemption for the remainder of that academic year, notwithstanding that the aggregate FTES generated under this paragraph subsequently reaches or exceeds the limit established in clause (i).

(D) On or before January 1, 2028, the governing boards of the community colleges described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) that choose to use the exemption pursuant to this paragraph shall jointly submit a report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code that includes, but is not limited to, the demographics, attendance rate, and class completion rate of students receiving an exemption pursuant to this paragraph.

(b) A community college district may contract with a state, a county contiguous to California, the federal government, or a foreign country, or an agency thereof, for payment of all or a part of a nonresident student’s tuition fee.

(c) Nonresident students shall not be reported as FTES for state apportionment purposes, except as provided by subdivision (j) or another statute, in
 which case a nonresident tuition fee shall not be charged.

(d) The nonresident tuition fee shall be set by the governing board of each community college district not later than March 1 of each year for the succeeding fiscal year. The governing board of each community college district shall provide nonresident students with notice of nonresident tuition fee changes during the spring term before the fall term in which the change will take effect. Nonresident tuition fee increases shall be gradual, moderate, and predictable. The fee may be paid in installments, as determined by the governing board of the district.

(e) (1) The fee established by the governing board of a community college district pursuant to subdivision (d) shall represent for nonresident students enrolled in 30 semester units or 45 quarter units of credit per fiscal year one or more of the
 following:

(A) The amount that was expended by the community college district for the expense of education as defined by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual in the preceding fiscal year increased by the projected percent increase in the United States Consumer Price Index as determined by the Department of Finance for the current fiscal year and succeeding fiscal year and divided by the FTES (including nonresident students) attending in the community college district in the preceding fiscal year. However, if for the community college district’s preceding fiscal year FTES of all students attending in the community college district in noncredit courses is equal to, or greater than, 10 percent of the community college district’s total FTES attending in the community college district, the community college district may substitute the data for expense of education in grades 13 and 14 and FTES in grades 13 and 14 attending
 in the community college district.

(B) The expense of education in the preceding fiscal year of all community college districts increased by the projected percent increase in the United States Consumer Price Index as determined by the Department of Finance for the fiscal year and succeeding fiscal year and divided by the FTES (including nonresident students) attending all community college districts during the preceding fiscal year. However, if the amount calculated under this paragraph for the succeeding fiscal year is less than the amount established for the current fiscal year or for any of the past four fiscal years, the community college district may set the nonresident tuition fee at the greater of the current or any of the past four-year amounts.

(C) An amount not to exceed the fee established by the governing board of any contiguous community college district.

(D) An amount not to exceed the amount that was expended by the community college district for the expense of education, but in no case less than the statewide average as set forth in subparagraph (B).

(E) An amount no greater than the average of the nonresident tuition fees of public community colleges of no less than 12 states that are comparable to California in cost of living. The determination of comparable states shall be based on a composite cost-of-living index as determined by the United States Department of Labor or a cooperating government agency.

(2) The additional revenue generated by the increased nonresident tuition permitted under the amendments made to this subdivision during the 2009–10 Regular Session shall be used to expand and enhance services to resident students. The admission of nonresident
 students shall not come at the expense of resident enrollment.

(f) The governing board of each community college district also shall adopt a tuition fee per unit of credit for nonresident students enrolled in more or less than 15 units of credit per term by dividing the fee determined in subdivision (e) by 30 for colleges operating on the semester system and 45 for colleges operating on the quarter system and rounding to the nearest whole dollar. The same rate shall be uniformly charged to nonresident students attending any terms or sessions maintained by the community college. The rate charged shall be the rate established for the fiscal year in which the term or session ends.

(g) Any loss in community college district revenue generated by the nonresident tuition fee shall not be offset by additional state funding.

(h) Any community college district that has fewer than 1,500 FTES and whose boundary is within 10 miles of another state that either (1) has a reciprocity agreement with California governing student attendance and fees, or (2) participates in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, may exempt students from that state, or may exempt students from those states that participate in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident students.

(i) Any community college district that has more than 1,500, but fewer than 3,001, FTES and whose boundary is within 10 miles of another state that either (1) has a reciprocity agreement with California governing student attendance and fees, or (2) participates in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, may, in any one fiscal year, exempt up to 100 FTES from that state or from states that participate in the Western Undergraduate Exchange from
 the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident students.

(j) The attendance of nonresident students who are exempted pursuant to subdivision (h) or (i), or pursuant to paragraph (3), (4), (5), (6), or (8) of subdivision (a), from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident students may be reported as resident FTES for state apportionment purposes. Any nonresident student reported as resident FTES for state apportionment purposes who is exempt pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), or pursuant to subdivision (h) or (i), shall pay a per-unit fee that is one and one-half times the amount of the fee established for residents pursuant to Section 76300. That fee shall be included in the FTES adjustments described in Section 76300 for purposes of computing apportionments.

(k) This section shall become inoperative on July
 1, 2028, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2029, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 796, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 15.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Sec. 6 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 796.    Inoperative July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 796.)
-------------------------------------------

76140.

(a) A community college district may admit, and shall charge a tuition fee to, nonresident students, except that a community college district may exempt from all or parts of the fee any person described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (6), and shall exempt from all of the fee any person described in paragraph (4), (5), or (7):

(1) All nonresidents who enroll for six or fewer units. Exemptions made pursuant to this paragraph shall not be made on an individual basis.

(2) Any nonresident who is both a citizen and resident of a foreign country, if the nonresident has demonstrated a financial need for the exemption. Not more
 than 10 percent of the nonresident foreign students attending any community college
 district may be so exempted. Exemptions made pursuant to this paragraph may be made on an individual basis.

(3) (A) A student who, as of August 29, 2005, was enrolled, or admitted with an intention to enroll, in the fall term of the 2005–06 academic year in a regionally accredited institution of higher education in Alabama, Louisiana, or Mississippi, and who could not continue the student’s attendance at that institution as a direct consequence of damage sustained by that institution as a result of Hurricane Katrina.

(B) The chancellor shall develop guidelines for the implementation of this paragraph. These guidelines shall include standards for appropriate documentation of student eligibility to the extent feasible.

(C) This paragraph shall apply only to the 2005–06 academic year.

(4) A special part-time student, other than a person excluded from the term “immigrant,” for purposes of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101), pursuant to paragraph (15) of subsection (a) of Section 1101 of Title 8 of the United States Code, admitted pursuant to Section 76001, 76003, or 76004.

(5) A nonresident student who is a United States citizen who resides in a foreign country, if that nonresident meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Demonstrates a financial need for the exemption.

(B) Has a
 parent or guardian who has been deported or was permitted to depart voluntarily under the federal Immigration and Nationality Act in accordance with Section 1229c of Title 8 of the United States Code. The student shall provide documents from the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services evidencing the deportation or voluntary departure of the student’s parent or guardian.

(C) Moved abroad as a result of the deportation or voluntary departure specified in subparagraph (B).

(D) Lived in California immediately before moving abroad. The student shall provide information and evidence that demonstrates the student previously lived in California.

(E) Attended a public or private secondary school, as described in
 Sections 52 and 53, in the state for three or more years. The student shall provide documents that demonstrate the student’s secondary school attendance.

(F) Upon enrollment, the student will be in the student’s first academic year as a matriculated student in California public higher education, as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 66010, will be living in California, and will file an affidavit with the institution stating that the student intends to establish residency in California as soon as possible.

(6) (A) A student who attends Lake Tahoe Community College and who has residence, pursuant to subparagraph (B), in one of the following communities in Nevada:

(i) Incline Village.

(ii) Kingsbury.

(iii) Round Hill.

(iv) Skyland.

(v) Stateline.

(vi) Zephyr Cove.

(B) Residence shall be determined pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 68060) of Chapter 1 of Part 41 of Division 5. A person shall have residence in one of the communities listed in subparagraph (A) if the person has lived in the community for more than one year immediately before seeking the fee exemption pursuant to this paragraph.

(C) The governing board of the Lake Tahoe
 Community College District shall adopt rules and regulations for determining a student’s residence classification and for establishing procedures for an appeal and review of the residence classification. No more than 200 students shall be exempted from payment of a nonresident tuition fee under this paragraph in any academic year.

(7) (A) A nonresident student who enrolls in a credit English as a second language (ESL) course at a California Community College and who is any of the following:

(i) A recent immigrant, as defined in Section 1101(a)(15) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(ii) A recent refugee, as defined in Section 1101(a)(42) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(iii) A person who has been granted asylum by the United States, as defined in Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(B) This exemption shall apply only to individuals who, upon entering the United States, settled in California and who have resided in California for less than one year.

(C) This exemption shall apply only to the tuition fee for credit ESL courses.

(b) A community college district may contract with a state, a county contiguous to California, the federal government, or a foreign country, or an agency thereof, for payment of all or a part of a nonresident student’s tuition fee.

(c) Nonresident students shall not be reported as full-time equivalent students (FTES) for state apportionment purposes, except as provided by subdivision (j) or another statute, in which case a nonresident tuition fee shall not be charged.

(d) The nonresident tuition fee shall be set by the governing board of each community college district not later than March 1 of each year for the succeeding fiscal year. The governing board of each community college district shall provide nonresident students with notice of nonresident tuition fee changes during the spring term before the fall term in which the change will take effect. Nonresident tuition fee increases shall be gradual, moderate, and predictable. The fee may be paid in installments, as determined by the governing board of the district.

(e) (1) The fee established by the governing board of a community college district pursuant to subdivision (d) shall represent for nonresident students enrolled in 30 semester units or 45 quarter units of credit per fiscal year one or more of the following:

(A) The amount that was expended by the community college district for the expense of education as defined by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual in the preceding fiscal year increased by the projected percent increase in the United States Consumer Price Index as determined by the Department of Finance for the current fiscal year and succeeding fiscal year and divided by the FTES (including nonresident students) attending in the community college district in the preceding fiscal year. However, if for the community college district’s
 preceding fiscal year FTES of all students attending in the community college district in noncredit courses is equal to, or greater than, 10 percent of the community college district’s total FTES attending in the community college district, the community college district may substitute the data for expense of education in grades 13 and 14 and FTES in grades 13 and 14 attending in the community college district.

(B) The expense of education in the preceding fiscal year of all community college districts increased by the projected percent increase in the United States Consumer Price Index as determined by the Department of Finance for the fiscal year and succeeding fiscal year and divided by the FTES (including nonresident students) attending all community college districts during the
 preceding fiscal year. However, if the amount calculated under this paragraph for the succeeding fiscal year is less than the amount established for the current fiscal year or for any of the past four fiscal years, the community college district may set the nonresident tuition fee at the greater of the current or any of the past four-year amounts.

(C) An amount not to exceed the fee established by the governing board of any contiguous community college district.

(D) An amount not to exceed the amount that was expended by the community college district for the expense of education, but in no case less than the statewide average as set forth in subparagraph (B).

(E) An amount no greater than the average of
 the nonresident tuition fees of public community colleges of no less than 12 states that are comparable to California in cost of living. The determination of comparable states shall be based on a composite cost-of-living index as determined by the United States Department of Labor or a cooperating government agency.

(2) The additional revenue generated by the increased nonresident tuition permitted under the amendments made to this subdivision during the 2009–10 Regular Session shall be used to expand and enhance services to resident students. The admission of nonresident students shall not come at the expense of resident enrollment.

(f) The governing board of each community college district also shall adopt a tuition fee per unit of credit for nonresident students enrolled
 in more or less than 15 units of credit per term by dividing the fee determined in subdivision (e) by 30 for colleges operating on the semester system and 45 for colleges operating on the quarter system and rounding to the nearest whole dollar. The same rate shall be uniformly charged to nonresident students attending any terms or sessions maintained by the community college. The rate charged shall be the rate established for the fiscal year in which the term or session ends.

(g) Any loss in community college district revenue generated by the nonresident tuition fee shall not be offset by additional state funding.

(h) Any community college district that has fewer than 1,500 FTES and whose boundary is within 10 miles of another state that either (1) has a reciprocity agreement with
 California governing student attendance and fees, or (2) participates in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, may exempt students from that state, or may exempt students from those states that participate in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident students.

(i) Any community college district that has more than 1,500, but fewer than 3,001, FTES and whose boundary is within 10 miles of another state that either (1) has a reciprocity agreement with California governing student attendance and fees, or (2) participates in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, may, in any one fiscal year, exempt up to 100 FTES from that state or from states that participate in the Western Undergraduate Exchange from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident
 students.

(j) The attendance of nonresident students who are exempted pursuant to subdivision (h) or (i), or pursuant to paragraph (3), (4), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a), from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident students may be reported as resident FTES for state apportionment purposes. Any nonresident student reported as resident FTES for state apportionment purposes who is exempt pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), or pursuant to subdivision (h) or (i), shall pay a per-unit fee that is one and one-half times the amount of the fee established for residents pursuant to Section 76300. That fee shall be included in the FTES adjustments described in Section 76300 for purposes of computing apportionments.

(k) This section shall
 become operative on July 1, 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 796, Sec. 4.   (AB 91)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Sec. 6 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 796.)
-------------------------------------------

76140.3.

(a) The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall make available to the Legislative Analyst’s Office all of the following data, categorized by community college district and by academic year, commencing with the 2009–10 academic year:

(1) The number of resident students, rendered both as headcount and as full-time equivalent students (FTES), including an identification of any resident enrollment above the district’s cap.

(2) The number of nonresident students, rendered both as headcount and as FTES.

(3) The per-unit nonresident tuition rate.

(4) The total amount of revenue received from nonresident tuition.

(5) The total apportionment funding received by the district.

(b) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall include, in its annual analysis of the Governor’s budget proposal, a summary of the data made available pursuant to subdivision (a), as well as an analysis of the degree to which the affected community colleges have complied with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 76140.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 259, Sec. 2.   (AB 2297)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

76140.5.

Notwithstanding Section 76140, a community college may classify a nonresident student who has been hired by a public agency, as a resident for purposes of enrollment in and completion of police academy training courses at a community college, if the student has passed all other requirements of the public agency and if written assurances are provided by the public agency that it intends to classify the student as a peace officer upon successful completion of the police academy training course.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 435, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76141.

(a) In addition to the nonresident tuition fee established pursuant to Section 76140, a community college district may charge to nonresident students an amount not to exceed the amount that was expended by the district for capital outlay in the preceding fiscal year divided by the total full-time equivalent students of the district in the preceding fiscal year.

(b) Any fee charged pursuant to this section shall not exceed 50 percent of the nonresident tuition fee established pursuant to Section 76140.

(c) (1) Any student who can demonstrate economic hardship, or who is a victim of persecution or discrimination in the country in which the student is a citizen and resident, is exempt from this fee.

(2) For purposes of this section, the governing board of each community college district that chooses to impose the fee authorized by this section shall adopt a definition of economic hardship that encompasses the financial circumstances of a person who is a recipient of benefits under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program described in Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Secs. 601 et seq.), the Supplemental Income/State
 Supplementary Program, or a general assistance program.

(d) Revenue from any fee charged pursuant to this section shall be expended only for purposes of capital outlay, maintenance, and equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 377, Sec. 1.   (AB 947)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

76142.

(a) A community college district may charge nonresident applicants who are both citizens and residents of a foreign country a processing fee not to exceed the lesser of: (1) the actual cost of processing an application and other documentation required by the federal government, or (2) one hundred dollars ($100), which may be deducted from the tuition fee at the time of enrollment.

(b) No processing fee shall be charged to an applicant who would be eligible for an exemption from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 76140 or who can demonstrate economic hardship. For purposes of this section, the governing board of each community college district that chooses to impose the fee authorized by this section shall adopt a definition of economic hardship that includes the financial circumstances of a person who is a victim of persecution or discrimination in the foreign country in which the applicant is a citizen and resident, or who is a recipient of benefits under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program described in Parts A and F of Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Secs. 601 et seq.), the Supplemental Income/State Supplementary Program, or a general assistance program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 11.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

76143.

For purposes of the nonresident tuition fee, a community college district shall disregard the time during which a student living in the district resided outside the state, if:

(1) The change of residence to a place outside the state was due to a job transfer and was made at the request of the employer of the student or the employer of the student’s spouse or, in the case of a student who resided with, and was a dependent of, the student’s parents, the change of residence was made at the request of an employer of either of the student’s parents.

(2) Such absence from the state was for a period of not more than four years. 

(3) At the time of application for admission to a college maintained by the district, the student would qualify as a resident if the period of the student’s absence from the state was disregarded.

A nonresident tuition fee shall not be charged to a student who meets each of the conditions specified in subdivisions (1) to (3), inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Student Records [76200. - 76246.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Intent [76200. - 76200.]

76200.

It is the intent of the Legislature to resolve potential conflicts between California law and the provisions of Public Law 93-380 regarding the confidentiality of student records in order to insure the continuance of federal education funds to public community colleges within the state, and to revise generally and update the law relating to such records.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [76210. - 76210.]

76210.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) (1) “Student record” means any item of information directly related to an identifiable student, other than directory information, which is maintained by a community college or required to be maintained by any employee in the performance of his or her duties, whether recorded by handwriting, print, tapes, film, microfilm or other means.

(2) “Student record” does not include (A) confidential letters and statements of recommendations maintained by a community college on or before January 1, 1975, if these letters or statements are not used for purposes other than those for which they were specifically intended, (B) information provided by a student’s parents relating to applications for financial aid or scholarships, or (C) information related to a student compiled by a community college officer or employee that remains in the sole possession of the maker and is not accessible or revealed to any other person except a substitute. For purposes of this paragraph, “substitute” means a person who performs, on a temporary basis, the duties of the individual who made the notes and does not refer to a person who permanently succeeds the maker of the notes in his or her position.

(3) “Student record” also does not include information related to a student created or maintained by a physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, or other recognized professional or paraprofessional acting in his or her professional or paraprofessional capacity, or assisting in that capacity, and that is created, maintained, or used only in connection with the provision of treatment to the student and is not available to anyone other than persons providing that treatment. However, that record may be personally reviewed by a physician or other appropriate professional of the student’s choice.

(4) “Student record” does not include information maintained by a community college law enforcement unit, if the personnel of the unit do not have access to student records pursuant to Section 76243, the information maintained by the unit is kept apart from information maintained pursuant to subdivision (a), the information is maintained solely for law enforcement purposes, and the information is not made available to persons other than law enforcement officials of the same jurisdiction. “Student record” does not include information maintained in the normal course of business pertaining to persons who are employed by a community college, if the information relates exclusively to the person in that person’s capacity as an employee and is not available for use for any other purpose.

(b) “Directory information” means one or more of the following items: a student’s name, address, telephone number, date and place of birth, major field of study, participation in officially recognized activities and sports, weight and height of members of athletic teams, dates of attendance, degrees and awards received, the most recent previous public or private school attended by the student, and any other information authorized in writing by the student.

(c) “Access” means a personal inspection and review of a record or an accurate copy of a record, or an oral description or communication of a record or an accurate copy of a record, and a request to release a copy of any record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Provisions [76220. - 76225.]

76220.

Community college districts shall establish, maintain, and destroy student records according to regulations adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges. Such regulations shall establish state policy as to what items of information shall be placed into student records and what information is appropriate to be compiled by individual community college officers or employees under the exception to student records provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 76210. No student records shall be destroyed except pursuant to such regulations or as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 76232.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

76221.

Community college districts shall notify students in writing of their rights under this chapter upon the date of the student’s enrollment and at least annually thereafter. The notice shall take a form that reasonably notifies students of the availability of the following specific information:

(a) The types of student records and information contained therein that are directly related to students and maintained by the institution.

(b) The official responsible for the maintenance of each type of record.

(c) The location of the log or record required to be maintained pursuant to Section 76222.

(d) The criteria to be used by the institution in defining “officials and employees” and in determining “legitimate educational interest” as used in Section 76222 and subdivision (a) of Section 76243.

(e) The policies of the institution for reviewing and expunging those records.

(f) The right of the student to have access to his or her records.

(g) The procedures for challenging the content of student records.

(h) The cost if any that will be charged for reproducing copies of records.

(i) The categories of information that the institution has designated as directory information pursuant to Section 76240.

(j) Any other rights and requirements set forth in this chapter and the right of the student to file a complaint with the United States Department of Education concerning an alleged failure by the institution to comply with Section 438 of the General Education Provisions Act (20 U.S.C.A. 1232g).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 32.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

76222.

A log or record shall be maintained for each student’s record which lists all persons, agencies, or organizations requesting or receiving information from the record and the legitimate interests therefor. The listing need not include any of the following:

(a) Students to whom access is granted pursuant to Section 76230.

(b) Parties to whom directory information is released pursuant to Section 76240.

(c) Parties for whom written consent has been executed by the student pursuant to Section 76242.

(d) Officials or employees having a legitimate educational interest pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 76243.

The log or record shall be open to inspection only by the student and the community college official or his or her designee responsible for the maintenance of student records, and to the Comptroller General of the United States, the Secretary of Education, an administrative head of an education agency as defined in Public Law 93-380, and state educational authorities as a means of auditing the operation of the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 33.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

76223.

Any community college may make a reasonable charge in an amount not to exceed the actual cost of furnishing copies of any student record; provided, however, that no charge shall be made for furnishing (1) up to two transcripts of students’ records or (2) up to two verifications of various records of students. No charge may be made to search for or to retrieve any student record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

76224.

(a) When grades are given for any course of instruction taught in a community college district, the grade given to each student shall be the grade determined by the instructor of the course and the determination of the student’s grade by the instructor, in the absence of mistake, fraud, bad faith, or incompetency, shall be final.

(b) No grade of a student participating in a physical education class, however, may be adversely affected due to the fact that the student does not wear standardized physical education apparel where the failure to wear such apparel arises from circumstances beyond the control of the student.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

76225.

(a) Whenever a student transfers from one community college or public or private institution of postsecondary education to another within the state, appropriate records or a copy of appropriate records shall be transferred by the former community college, or college or university upon a request from the student. Any community college, college, or university making a transfer of these records shall notify the student of the student’s right to receive a copy of the record and the student’s right to a hearing to challenge the content of the record.

(b) The board of governors may adopt rules and regulations concerning the transfer of records pursuant to subdivision (a) to, from, or between colleges under its jurisdiction.
